apertium-pl-dsb.dsb.metadix
    <pardef n="dw/a__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ě</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ě</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eju</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eju</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eju</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eju</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eju</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ě</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ě</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ěma</l>
          <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tś/i__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>och</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>och</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omi</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imi</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>och</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="styr/i__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>joch</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jom</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>joch</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jomi</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imi</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>joch</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Afri/ka__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Afrika"><i>Afri</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Amerika"><i>Ameri</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Antarktika"><i>Antarkti</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Finska"><i>Fins</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Albańska"><i>Albańs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Awstriska"><i>Awstris</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Belgiska"><i>Belgis</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Běłoruska"><i>Běłorus</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bulgarska"><i>Bulgars</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Chorwatska"><i>Chorwats</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Česka"><i>Čes</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Čechojska"><i>Čechojs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dańska"><i>Dańs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Estniska"><i>Estnis</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Francojska"><i>Francojs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Grichiska"><i>Grichis</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hungorska"><i>Hungors</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Irska"><i>Irs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Islandska"><i>Islands</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Letiska"><i>Letis</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Liechtensteinska"><i>Liechtensteins</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Litawska"><i>Litaws</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Luxemburgska"><i>Luxemburgs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Makedońska"><i>Makedońs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Moldawska"><i>Moldaws</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nimska"><i>Nims</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Norwegska"><i>Norwegs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nižozemska"><i>Nižozems</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hollandska"><i>Hollands</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Pólska"><i>Póls</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Portugalska"><i>Portugals</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rumuńska"><i>Rumuńs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ruska"><i>Rus</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rusojska"><i>Rusojs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Słowakska"><i>Słowaks</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Słowjeńska"><i>Słowjeńs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Špańska"><i>Špańs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Šwedska"><i>Šweds</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Šwedojska"><i>Šwedojs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Šwicarska"><i>Šwicars</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Turkojska"><i>Turkojs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ukrainska"><i>Ukrains</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Włoska"><i>Włos</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Italska"><i>Itals</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jenźelska"><i>Jenźels</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Engelska"><i>Engels</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jugosłowjańska"><i>Jugosłowjańs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Šotiska"><i>Šotis</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Čechosłowakska"><i>Čechosłowaks</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Armeńska"><i>Armeńs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Georgiska"><i>Georgis</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kirgiziska"><i>Kirgizis</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Turkmeńska"><i>Turkmeńs</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Usbekska"><i>Usbeks</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sakska"><i>Saks</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bramborska"><i>Brambors</i><par n="Afri/ka__np"/></e>
